Wisconsin, session 2025, AB205.
do enact as follows:AB205,13Section 1. 97.19 of the statutes is created to read:AB205,1,4497.19 Maple syrup requirements. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB205,1,55(a) “Maple syrup” has the meaning given in 21 CFR 168.140.AB205,1,76(b) “Public eating place” means any premise that prepares and sells food for 7the general public’s consumption.AB205,2,48(2) Requirements for serving maple syrup in public eating places. The 1serving of a product identified as maple syrup at a public eating place is prohibited 2unless the product is made entirely of maple syrup. Nothing in this subsection 3prohibits the serving of a product that is not maple syrup if the product is not 4identified as maple syrup.AB205,2,55